Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-801
Eugene C. Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied Diseases; established; location.

There is hereby established the Eugene C. Eppley Institute for Research in Cancer and Allied Diseases, to be located on the campus of the University of Nebraska Medical Center in Omaha, Nebraska.

Laws 1972, LB 1374, § 1.